Hawaii statutes.
[§508C-11] Enforcement of environmental
covenant. (a) A civil action for injunctive or other equitable relief for
violation of an environmental covenant may be maintained by:

(1) A party to the covenant;

(2) The department or any other agency specified in
the covenant;

(3) Any person to whom the covenant expressly grants
power to enforce;

(4) A person whose interest in the real property or
whose collateral or liability may be affected by the alleged violation of the
covenant; or

(5) A county in which the real property subject to
the covenant is located.

(b) This chapter shall not limit the
regulatory authority of the department or any governmental unit under law other
than this chapter with respect to an environmental response project.

(c) A person shall not be responsible for or
subject to liability for environmental remediation solely because the person
has the right to enforce an environmental covenant. [L 2006, c 279, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next